Utah statutes.
59-13-401.   Aviation fuel tax -- Rate.
(1)  A tax is imposed upon aviation fuel at the rates provided in this
section.
(2)  Except as provided by Subsection (3), the tax on aviation fuel shall be 9
cents per gallon.
(3)  Aviation fuel purchased for use by a federally certificated air carrier
is subject to a tax of:
(a)  4 cents per gallon on aviation fuel purchased other than at an
international airport:
(i)  located within a county of the first class; and
(ii)  that has a United States customs office on its premises; or
(b)  2.5 cents per gallon on aviation fuel purchased at an international
airport:
(i)  located within a county of the first class; and
(ii)  that has a United States customs office on its premises.
